Alabama, session 2026rs, HB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) High school students who sign commitment
letters at a ceremony during instructional time at school as
part of organized National Signing Day activities related to
the acceptance of athletic scholarships, postsecondary school
or university educational commitments, commitments to
apprenticeship programs, and military enlistments shall be
excused from class.
(b) For activities conducted pursuant to subsection
(a):
(1) A school shall provide reasonable accommodations.
For purposes of this subdivision, reasonable accommodations
shall include, but not be limited to, meeting space with
Internet connectivity access and seating, the use of which
will not interfere with instruction;
(2) Guests may attend subject to local board of
education policy; and
(3) A school principal may excuse other students to
Page 1

(3) A school principal may excuse other students to
HB75 Enrolled
attend.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB75 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 03-Mar-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Amended and Passed

House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3